Idaho, session 2025, S1143.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. That Chapter 41, Title 39, Idaho Code, be, and the same is
hereby amended by the addition thereto of a NEW SECTION, to be known and des-
ignated as Section 39-4117, Idaho Code, and to read as follows:
39-4117. PUBLISHING OF BUILDING PERMIT REQUIREMENTS -- TIMELY REVIEW
-- PUBLIC HEARINGS. (1) A local government that requires building permits
shall publish a document that describes in detail the requirements of its
building permit process. The local government shall make the document
available to the public on its website and in physical form upon request.
(2) An applicant for a building permit shall make a good faith effort
to ensure that an application for a building permit is complete and contains
all of the necessary documentation required by a local government pursuant
to the document required in subsection (1) of this section. In the event that
an applicant submits an incomplete application, the local government shall,
within ten (10) business days, inform the applicant of any missing informa-
tion needed to complete the application.
(3) Upon receipt of a complete application for a building permit, a lo-
cal government shall have ten (10) business days to review the application to
verify that the requirements of subsection (2) of this section have been met,
as well as to verify that all necessary legal descriptions are correct. No
later than the conclusion of the ten (10) business day review period, the lo-
cal government shall publish a notice of determination on the completeness
of the application.
(4) An applicant and a local government may agree in writing to a later
review deadline than required pursuant to this section. Prior to any such
agreement, a local government shall provide written notice to an applicant
explaining why it is unable to meet the ten (10) business day review deadline
pursuant to subsection (3) of this section.
(5) Once the local government has determined the application to be
complete, and the requirements of subsections (2) and (3) of this section
have been met, the local government's relevant final reviewing department or
agency that will give final approval or denial of the application, such as
the local government's building permit board, shall schedule a public hear-
ing within forty-five (45) business days from when the application is deemed
complete, when necessary.


SECTION 2. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, this act shall be in full force and effect on and after
July 1, 2025.